Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 4

Delegation of Purchasing Authority

12-3-401. Procedure for delegated authority.

The chief procurement officer may authorize any or all state agencies to procure all or any specific types and classes of goods or services, without following the procedures relating to the requisitioning of such goods or services through the central procurement office. The comptroller of the treasury shall review and approve such delegations as required by procurement commission policy. The chief procurement officer shall consider the individual state agency's purchasing record in these delegations and shall periodically review purchasing activities of any state agency granted such delegation, and may reduce or revoke such delegated purchasing authority.

It is intended that delegation of purchase authority may be made by state agency, by type of good or service, by dollar amount of procurement, or by any combination thereof, in order to reduce the procurement time required and to increase the amount of purchases made from any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business, as defined in § 12-3-1102.

Upon delegated authority, any procurement not exceeding fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), for which a source of supply has not otherwise been established, shall be made without requisitioning such goods or services through the central procurement office; provided, that procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small purchase under this section.

All requisitions and solicitations provided for in this section shall be posted on the state procurement office's website, at a minimum providing the following information, as applicable, regarding each such procurement:

Procuring agency;

Requisition number;

Vendor;

Total amount of requisition;

Line item of description; and

Line item amount.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 19; 2017, ch. 485, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 4, §§12-3-401 —12-3-403 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 3, 33 (Williams, §§ 370.12, 370.42); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; Acts 1970, ch. 548, § 1; 1972, ch. 543, § 16; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(50); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-301-12-303,12-3-201,12-3-202,12-3-203; Acts 1981, ch. 332, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning the board of standards, was repealed by Acts 2011, ch. 295, § 11, effective April 1, 2012.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-210 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.